Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 1 Organization and Members

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization of administration of Commission, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Public Service Commission, Chapter 515-1-1.

46-2-1.
Election of Commissioners; terms of office.

The Georgia Public Service Commission shall consist of five members to be elected as provided in this Code section. The members in office on January 1, 2022, and any member appointed or elected to fill a vacancy in such membership prior to the expiration of a term of office shall continue to serve out their respective terms of office. As terms of office expire, new members elected to the commission shall be required to be residents of one of five Public Service Commission Districts as hereafter provided, but each member of the commission shall be elected state wide by the qualified voters of this state who are entitled to vote for members of the General Assembly. Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the election shall be held under the same rules and regulations as apply to the election of Governor. The Commissioners, who shall give their entire time to the duties of their offices, shall be elected at the general election next preceding the expiration of the terms of office of the respective incumbents. Their terms of office shall be six years and shall expire on December 31.

In order to be elected as a member of the commission from a Public Service Commission District, a person shall have resided in that district for at least 12 months prior to election thereto. A person elected as a member of the commission from a Public Service Commission District by the voters of Georgia shall continue to reside in that district during the person’s term of office, or that office shall thereupon become vacant.

For the purpose of electing the members of the Public Service Commission, this state shall be divided into five Public Service Commission Districts described as follows:

Click to view

The first members of the commission elected under this Code section shall be elected thereto on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November, 2024, from Public Service Commission Districts 3 and 5, shall take office on the first day of January immediately following that election, and shall serve for terms of office of six years and until the election and qualification of their respective successors. Those members of the commission elected thereto on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November, 2026, from Public Service Commission Districts 1 and 4 shall take office on the first day of January immediately following that election and shall serve for terms of office of six years and until the election and qualification of their respective successors. The member of the commission elected thereto on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November, 2022, from Public Service Commission District 2 shall take office on the first day of January immediately following that election and shall serve for a term of office of six years and until the election and qualification of his or her respective successor. All future successors to members of the commission whose terms of office are to expire shall be elected at the state-wide general election immediately preceding the expiration of such terms, shall take office on the first day of January immediately following that election, and shall serve for terms of office of six years.

District 001 Appling County Atkinson County Bacon County Baker County Baldwin County Ben Hill County Berrien County Bibb County Bleckley County Brantley County Brooks County Bryan County Calhoun County Camden County Charlton County Chattahoochee County Clay County Clinch County Coffee County Colquitt County Cook County Crawford County Crisp County Decatur County Dodge County Dooly County Dougherty County Early County Echols County Evans County Glynn County Grady County Harris County Houston County Irwin County Jeff Davis County Johnson County Jones County Lanier County Laurens County Lee County Liberty County Long County Lowndes County Macon County Marion County McIntosh County Miller County Mitchell County Monroe County Montgomery County Muscogee County Peach County Pierce County Pulaski County Quitman County Randolph County Schley County Seminole County Stewart County Sumter County Talbot County Tattnall County Taylor County Telfair County Terrell County Thomas County Tift County Toombs County Treutlen County Turner County Twiggs County Ware County Wayne County Webster County Wheeler County Wilcox County Wilkinson County Worth County District 002 Banks County Barrow County Bulloch County Burke County Butts County Candler County Chatham County Clarke County Columbia County Effingham County Elbert County Emanuel County Glascock County Greene County Hancock County Hart County Henry County Jackson County Jasper County Jefferson County Jenkins County Lincoln County Madison County McDuffie County Morgan County Newton County Oconee County Oglethorpe County Putnam County Richmond County Rockdale County Screven County Spalding County Taliaferro County Walton County Warren County Washington County Wilkes County District 003 Clayton County DeKalb County Fulton County District 004 Cherokee County Dawson County Fannin County Forsyth County Franklin County Gilmer County Gwinnett County Habersham County Hall County Lumpkin County Murray County Pickens County Rabun County Stephens County Towns County Union County White County Whitfield County District 005 Bartow County Carroll County Catoosa County Chattooga County Cobb County Coweta County Dade County Douglas County Fayette County Floyd County Gordon County Haralson County Heard County Lamar County Meriwether County Paulding County Pike County Polk County Troup County Upson County Walker County

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 1; Code 1882, § 719a; Civil Code 1895, § 2185; Ga. L. 1906, p. 100, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 1; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2615, 2616; Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 1; Code 1933, § 93-201; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1530, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 359, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 642, § 1/SB 382; Ga. L. 2022, p. 472, § 1/SB 472.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 11, 2002, rewrote the descriptions of Public Service Commission Districts 1 through 5 following the colon at the end of the introductory language in subsection (c) and added subsection (e).

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 1, 2012, in subsection (a), substituted “January 1, 2012” for “January 1, 2000”; in subsection (b), twice substituted “shall” for “must” in the first and second sentences and added a comma following “office” in the second sentence; in the introductory paragraph of
subsection (c), substituted “this state ” for “the state” and rewrote the descriptions of the Public Service Commission Districts 1 through 5; in subsection (d), substituted “November, 2012” for “November, 2000” in the first sentence, substituted “November, 2014” for “November, 2002” in the second sentence, and substituted “November, 2016” for “November, 2004” in the third sentence; and deleted former subsection (e), relating to definitions and conditions.

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 4, 2022, substituted “January 1, 2022” for “January 1, 2012” in subsection (a); rewrote the descriptions of Public Service Commission Districts 1 through 5 following the colon at the end of the introductory language in subsection (c); and, in subsection (d), substituted “November, 2024” for “November, 2012” in the first sentence, “November, 2026” for “November, 2014” in the second sentence, and “November, 2022” for “November, 2016” in the third sentence.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2022, “Chattooga County” was substituted for “ChattooCounty County” in the entry for Public Service Commission District 5.

46-2-2.
Qualifications of Commissioners; restriction on any interest in companies under jurisdiction of commission; disqualification of Commissioner.

Any person who is at least 30 years of age, is qualified to vote as an elector, and is not directly or indirectly interested in any mercantile business or any corporation that is controlled by or that participates in the benefit of any pool, combination, trust, contract, or arrangement that has the effect of increasing or tending to increase the cost to the public of carriage, heat, light, power, or any commodity or merchandise sold to the public shall be eligible for membership on the commission, without regard to his experience in law or in the utility or transportation business.

During their terms of office, the Commissioners shall not, jointly or severally, or in any way, be the holders of any stock or bonds, or be agents or employees of any company, or have any interest in any company under the jurisdiction of the commission. If any Commissioner becomes disqualified in any way, he shall at once remove the disqualification or resign; and on failure to do so he shall be suspended from office by the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 1; Code 1882, § 719a; Civil Code 1895, § 2185; Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 2620; Code 1933, § 93-202.

Cross references.

Conflicts of interest of state officials and employees generally, § 45-10-20 et seq.

46-2-3.
Oath of office of Commissioners.

The Commissioners shall take an oath of office, the wording of which shall be determined by the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 1; Code 1882, § 719a; Civil Code 1895, § 2185; Civil Code 1910, § 2619; Code 1933, § 93-203.

46-2-4.
Filling of vacancies on commission.

Any vacancy in the commission shall be filled by the Governor. Any person so appointed shall hold his office until the next regular general election and until his successor for the balance of the unexpired term has been elected and has qualified.

History.

Ga. L. 1906, p. 100, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 2617; Code 1933, § 93-204.

46-2-5.
Chairperson of commission; selection.

There shall be a chairperson of the commission. The chairperson shall be selected by a simple majority of the members of the commission. The chairperson serving on December 31, 2012, shall serve for a term of office as chairperson until January 1, 2013, or until his or her term as a member of the commission shall expire, whichever is shorter. Each subsequent chairperson shall serve for a two-year term of office as chairperson or until his or her term as a member of the commission shall expire, whichever is shorter. Any four members of the commission may call for an election of a chairperson at any time prior to the end of the term of a chairperson; provided, however, that such elections shall not be held more than twice per calendar year, except in the case of a vacancy by the chairperson; and provided, further, that any chairperson so elected shall serve for a two-year term of office as chairperson or until his or her term as a member of the commission shall expire, whichever is shorter. No commissioner shall be elected or serve as chairperson for more than two consecutive terms.

The chairperson shall give his or her entire time to the duties of the office.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 2622; Ga. L. 1919, p. 92, § 2; Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 7; Code 1933, § 93-206; Ga. L. 1947, p. 673, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 613, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1960, p. 57, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1963, p. 651, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 95, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2335, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1176, § 1/SB 483.

The 2012 amendment,

effective December 31, 2012, rewrote subsection (a); deleted former subsections (b) and (c); redesignated former subsection (d) as present subsection (b); and rewrote subsection (b).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “April 20, 1992,” was substituted for “this Code section becomes effective” in the third sentence of subsection (a).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2012, “serving on December 31, 2012,” was substituted for “currently serving on the effective date of this Code section” in the second sentence of subsection (a).

46-2-6.
Salary of Commissioners.

The salary of each Commissioner shall be as provided in Code Section 45-7-4, provided that nothing in this Code section or in Code Section 46-2-5 shall entitle an emeritus commissioner to a salary greater than $12,000.00 per annum.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 1; Code 1882, § 719a; Civil Code 1895, § 2185; Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 15; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2621, 2670; Ga. L. 1919, p. 92, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1919, p. 94, § 1; Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 99; Code 1933, § 93-208; Ga. L. 1947, p. 673, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 668, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 613, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1960, p. 57, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1963, p. 651, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 95, § 2.

46-2-7.
Employment of officers, experts, and other employees by commission; compensation of employees.

The commission shall have power to employ such officers, experts, engineers, statisticians, accountants, inspectors, clerks, and other employees as it may deem necessary to perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred by law upon the commission. The compensation of such employees shall be fixed by the commission at such sums as it may deem reasonable and proper.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 4; Civil Code 1910, § 2623; Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 2; Code 1933, § 93-207.

Cross references.

Applicability of conflicts of interest laws to full-time state employees hired by commission to assist commission in fulfilling duties and responsibilities, § 45-10-20.

46-2-7.1.
Director of utilities.

On or before July 1, 1981, the commission shall employ a director of utilities, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission and whose salary shall be set by the commission.

The director of utilities shall:

Direct the activities of the utility divisions and sections;

Manage and coordinate the commission’s preparation of rate cases;

Schedule and coordinate all in-house, reactive, regular, and engineering audits;

Direct all utility personnel and the preparation of that section of the commission’s budget; and

Perform such other duties as the commission may establish by order.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-207.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 3.

46-2-7.2.
Public information officer.

On or before September 1, 1981, the commission shall employ a public information officer, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission.

The public information officer shall:

Report directly to the executive secretary;

Maintain the commission’s public information files;

Coordinate official commission press releases and media relations; and

Perform such other duties as the executive secretary may establish.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-207.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 121, § 3.

46-2-8.
Payment of salaries and expenses by commission; appropriations for salaries and expenses; designation of Public Service Commission Fund.

The salaries fixed by the commission for its officers, experts, engineers, statisticians, accountants, inspectors, clerks, and other employees, and fixed by Code Section 45-7-4 for Commissioners, shall be paid monthly from the funds provided for the use of the commission after being approved by the commission. All expenses incurred by the commission, including the actual and necessary traveling and other expenses and disbursements of the Commissioners, and of officers and employees, incurred while on business of the commission, shall be paid from the funds provided for the use of the commission after being approved by the commission. The necessary expenses of conducting the business of the commission and the salaries of the Commissioners shall be provided for by appropriations made for such purposes. The funds assessed and collected as provided in Code Section 46-2-10 shall be specially designated as the Public Service Commission Fund and shall be expended only as provided and directed in this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 99; Code 1933, § 93-209; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 613, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1960, p. 57, § 2.

46-2-9.
Domicile of commission; jurisdiction of actions involving commission or business entities regulated by commission; furnishing commission with office and supplies.

The domicile of the commission is fixed at the capital; and no courts of this state other than those of Fulton County shall have or take jurisdiction in any action brought or instituted against the commission or on account of any of its orders or rules, provided that nothing in this Code section shall prevent the courts of the county in which is located the principal office of a business entity regulated by the commission from having or taking jurisdiction in any action brought or instituted against that business entity as a result of any such commission order or rule.

The commission shall be furnished with necessary furniture and stationery and an office in Atlanta.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2186; Ga. L. 1905, p. 95, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 14; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2625, 2627; Code 1933, § 93-211; Ga. L. 1976, p. 418, § 1.

46-2-10.
Payment of special fee by corporations and utilities subject to jurisdiction of commission; notice of amount due; procedure on default.

There shall be paid by all public service corporations and utilities which are subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission a special fee in addition to all other fees required by law. Such fee shall be fixed by the state revenue commissioner upon each of such public service corporations or utilities according to the gross revenues of each such public service corporation or utility resulting from intrastate service regulated by the commission, as ascertained by the state revenue commissioner from reports filed with the state revenue commissioner by such public service corporations and utilities and from gross revenues reported for income tax purposes pursuant to Chapter 7 of Title 48, and shall be apportioned among such public service corporations or utilities upon the basis of such gross revenues so as to produce a revenue of $1,050,000.00 per annum. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code section, the gross revenues of a telephone utility shall not include revenues of such a utility received from the collection of interstate tolls, interstate access or subscriber line charges, interstate call charges, amounts paid by a telecommunications service provider to any other telecommunications service provider for carrier access charges, or any charges for any unregulated services. Any revenues collected by a local exchange company as a billing and collection agent shall be excluded from the calculation of the gross revenues of the local exchange company.

Not later than December 1, 1994, the state revenue commissioner shall notify each public service corporation or utility of the state of the amount due by it under this Code section, and the fee shall be paid into the general fund of the state by January 20, 1995. Such sum of $1,050,000.00 shall be available for appropriation in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of operating the Public Service Commission.

Effective January 1, 1995, not later than April 1 of each year, the state revenue commissioner shall notify each public service corporation or utility of the state of the amount due by it under this Code section, and the fee shall be paid into the general fund of the state by July 1 of such year. Such sum of $1,050,000.00 shall be available for appropriation in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of operating the Public Service Commission.

In case of default in payment by any public service corporation or utility of the fee provided for in this Code section, the state revenue commissioner shall proceed to collect the same in the same manner as franchise taxes are collected.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 143, § 6; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 99; Code 1933, § 93-210; Ga. L. 1960, p. 168, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 664, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1063, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 263, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 856, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 630, § 1.